test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-kaqj_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - kaʼj: # Noun 122 'eng /est kahju/fin' - full paradigm
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Nom: [kaʼj, kaj]
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Gen: [kaʼj, kaj]
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Par: [kaʼjjõ, kajjõ]
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Dat: [kaʼjjõn, kajjõn]
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Ins: [kaʼjjõks, kajjõks]
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Ill: [kaʼjjõ, kajjõ]
     kaʼj+N+Sg+Ela: [kaʼjstõ, kajstõ]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Nom: [kaʼjd, kajd]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Gen: [kaʼjd, kajd]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Par: [kaʼjḑi, kajḑi]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Dat: [kaʼjdõn, kajdõn]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Ins: [kaʼjdõks, kajdõks]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Ill: [kaʼjži, kajži]
     kaʼj+N+Pl+Ela: [kaʼjšti, kajšti]
